Utah statutes.
24-1-103.   Jurisdiction and venue.

(1)  A state district court has jurisdiction over any action filed in accordance with this title regarding:

(a)  all interests in property if the property is within this state at the time the action is filed; and

(b)  a claimant's interests in the property, if the claimant is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the district court.

(2) (a)  In addition to the venue provided for under Title 78B, Chapter 3, Part 3, Place of Trial - Venue, or any other provisions of law, a proceeding for forfeiture under this title may be maintained in the judicial district in which:

(i)  any part of the property is found; or

(ii)  a civil or criminal action could be maintained against a claimant for the conduct alleged to constitute grounds for forfeiture.

(b)  A claimant may obtain a change of venue under Section 78B-3-309.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

